Rhode Island, session 2025, SB86.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 39-1.1-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 39-1.1 entitled "Termination
of Service to Persons Who Are Disabled, Seriously Ill, or in Arrears of Payment" is hereby amended
to read as follows:
39-1.1-2. Determination of persons subject to nontermination.
(a) The commission shall promulgate appropriate rules and regulations to determine which
persons who are elderly, disabled, or seriously ill are subject to the nontermination provisions of §
39-1.1-1, and in what manner relief will be made available to the subject persons.
(b) Rules and regulations maintained to determine which persons are seriously ill shall
include the provision that said determination shall be through certification to the public utility or to
the division of public utilities and carriers by a licensed physician.
(1) A licensed physician’s certification of serious illness shall be sufficient if initially made
by telephone. In such event, the public utility or the division, whichever received initial
certification, shall inform the certifying physician that he or she must forward to the public utility
within seven (7) days a written certification indicating the name and address of the seriously ill
person, the nature of the illness, and its likely duration. The public utility shall acknowledge receipt
of such written certification and shall notify the customer in writing of the date upon which service
will be terminated, unless the customer: (i) Has arranged for payment of an outstanding amount
with the public utility, pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the commission; (ii)

Requests a hearing, pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the commission; or (iii)
Enrolls in a residential payment plan or other payment arrangement. The termination date shall be
not less than the last day of the period specified by the physician as the duration of the illness. If
the physician has failed to specify the length of the illness, or if the physician has indicated that the
length of the illness is not readily a ascertainable, then the termination date shall be not less than
three (3) weeks months from receipt by the public utility of the written certification. If the duration
of the illness exceeds three (3) weeks from the certification to the public utility, the termination
date the customer may request a review pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the
commission, to determine whether the initial exemption shall continue, for how long, and under
what circumstances.
(2) A public utility must honor a licensed physician’s certification of serious illness, but
may seek division review of the validity of the certification, pursuant to rules and regulations
promulgated by the commission. If a licensed physician’s certification does not comply with the
requirements promulgated by the commission and is rejected by a public utility, the public utility
shall inform the customer immediately, in writing, of the reasons for rejection of the certification
and the customer’s right to have the division review the utility’s rejection of the certification.
(3) Nontermination for any reason does not, in any way, relieve the customer of liability
incurred for utility services.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000181
========
LC000181 - Page 2 of 3